dictionaries/tt_RU/tt_RU.dic
алтылап/24,51,52,53,55,57,60
биш/23,49,50,54,56,58,59
бормалау/62,63,66,67,69,72,73,75,79,80,83,84,86,88,90,91,93,95,99,101,103,112,114,116,118,120,121,123,125,127,129,133,135,137,139,141,142,143,145,147,149,151,153,155,157,159,161,164,165,167,169,171,173,175,177,179,181,183,186,187,190
вепс/1,3,7,10,13,14,16,18,20,22,26,28,30,31,33,36,38,41,42,45,46
гади/48
гарьләнү/61,64,65,68,70,71,74,76,77,78,81,82,85,87,89,92,94,96,100,102,104,111,113,115,117,119,122,124,126,128,130,132,134,136,138,140,144,146,148,150,152,154,156,158,160,162,163,166,168,170,172,174,176,178,180,182,184,185,188,189
гаясез/47
гәрниз/2,4,5,8,11,12,15,17,19,21,25,27,29,32,34,35,37,39,40,43,44
дүрт/23,49,50,54,56,58,59
егерме/24,51,52,53,55,57,60
җиләс/48
җиңешү/61,64,65,68,70,71,74,76,77,78,81,82,85,87,89,92,94,96,100,102,104,111,113,115,117,119,122,124,126,128,130,132,134,136,138,140,144,146,148,150,152,154,156,158,160,162,163,166,168,170,172,174,176,178,180,182,184,185,188,189
җитмешәр/23,49,50,54,56,58,59
ихсан/1,3,7,10,13,14,16,18,20,22,26,28,30,31,33,36,38,41,42,45,46
йөзәр/23,49,50,54,56,58,59
йомрылау/62,63,66,67,69,72,73,75,79,80,83,84,86,88,90,91,93,95,99,101,103,112,114,116,118,120,121,123,125,127,129,133,135,137,139,141,142,143,145,147,149,151,153,155,157,159,161,164,165,167,169,171,173,175,177,179,181,183,186,187,190
каноник/2,4,5,8,11,12,15,17,19,21,25,27,29,32,34,35,37,39,40,43,44
катканаклы/47
кәмитләнү/61,64,65,68,70,71,74,76,77,78,81,82,85,87,89,92,94,96,100,102,104,111,113,115,117,119,122,124,126,128,130,132,134,136,138,140,144,146,148,150,152,154,156,158,160,162,163,166,168,170,172,174,176,178,180,182,184,185,188,189
күзегү/61,64,65,68,70,71,74,76,77,78,81,82,85,87,89,92,94,96,100,102,104,111,113,115,117,119,122,124,126,128,130,132,134,136,138,140,144,146,148,150,152,154,156,158,160,162,163,166,168,170,172,174,176,178,180,182,184,185,188,189
куна/1,3,7,10,13,14,16,18,20,22,26,28,30,31,33,36,38,41,42,45,46
күтәртмә/2,4,5,8,11,12,15,17,19,21,25,27,29,32,34,35,37,39,40,43,44,48
кыенайту/62,63,66,67,69,72,73,75,79,80,83,84,86,88,90,91,93,95,99,101,103,112,114,116,118,120,121,123,125,127,129,133,135,137,139,141,142,143,145,147,149,151,153,155,157,159,161,164,165,167,169,171,173,175,177,179,181,183,186,187,190
кырыгышарлап/24,51,52,53,55,57,60
лемминг/2,4,5,8,11,12,15,17,19,21,25,27,29,32,34,35,37,39,40,43,44
меңәү/23,49,50,54,56,58,59
микропорлы/47
ориенталистика/1,3,7,10,13,14,16,18,20,22,26,28,30,31,33,36,38,41,42,45,46
өченче/24,51,52,53,55,57,60
өчәү/23,49,50,54,56,58,59
очындыру/62,63,66,67,69,72,73,75,79,80,83,84,86,88,90,91,93,95,99,101,103,112,114,116,118,120,121,123,125,127,129,133,135,137,139,141,142,143,145,147,149,151,153,155,157,159,161,164,165,167,169,171,173,175,177,179,181,183,186,187,190
парикмахерский/2,4,5,8,11,12,15,17,19,21,25,27,29,32,34,35,37,39,40,43,44
рационалистик/48
сериялелек/1,3,7,10,13,14,16,18,20,22,26,28,30,31,33,36,38,41,42,45,46
сөзәкләндерү/61,64,65,68,70,71,74,76,77,78,81,82,85,87,89,92,94,96,100,102,104,111,113,115,117,119,122,124,126,128,130,132,134,136,138,140,144,146,148,150,152,154,156,158,160,162,163,166,168,170,172,174,176,178,180,182,184,185,188,189
сөрмәле/47
стерлинг/2,4,5,8,11,12,15,17,19,21,25,27,29,32,34,35,37,39,40,43,44
тоник/48
трио/1,3,7,10,13,14,16,18,20,22,26,28,30,31,33,36,38,41,42,45,46
түнегү/61,64,65,68,70,71,74,76,77,78,81,82,85,87,89,92,94,96,100,102,104,111,113,115,117,119,122,124,126,128,130,132,134,136,138,140,144,146,148,150,152,154,156,158,160,162,163,166,168,170,172,174,176,178,180,182,184,185,188,189
турбиналы/47
тыпранлау/62,63,66,67,69,72,73,75,79,80,83,84,86,88,90,91,93,95,99,101,103,112,114,116,118,120,121,123,125,127,129,133,135,137,139,141,142,143,145,147,149,151,153,155,157,159,161,164,165,167,169,171,173,175,177,179,181,183,186,187,190
унарлаган/24,51,52,53,55,57,60
унбиш/23,49,50,54,56,58,59
уннарча/24,51,52,53,55,57,60
феодализм/2,4,5,8,11,12,15,17,19,21,25,27,29,32,34,35,37,39,40,43,44
шалдыравыклы/1,3,7,10,13,14,16,18,20,22,26,28,30,31,33,36,38,41,42,45,46
экземалы/47
этнографик/48
